Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 33
MARIJUANA FINANCIAL SERVICES COOPERATIVES

11-33-101 to 11-33-128. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article repealed, (HB 20-1217), ch. 93, p. 369, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This article 33 was added in 2014. For amendments to this article 33 prior to its repeal in 2020, consult the 2019 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.